Utah statutes.
78B-5-601.   Statutes as evidence.

(1)  The recitals in a public statute are conclusive evidence of the fact recited for the purpose of carrying it into effect.

(2)  The recitals in a private statute are conclusive evidence between parties who claim under its provisions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

